Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-727
Limited immunity of petitioner.

(a) Participation by a petitioner in a proceeding under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act before a responding tribunal, whether in person, by private attorney, or through services provided by the support enforcement agency, does not confer personal jurisdiction over the petitioner in another proceeding.

(b) A petitioner is not amenable to service of civil process while physically present in this state to participate in a proceeding under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.

(c) The immunity granted by this section does not extend to civil litigation based on acts unrelated to a proceeding under the act committed by a party while present in this state to participate in the proceeding.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 27;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 66.